Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1919
Intern's license; qualifications.

A person may apply for and receive an intern's license authorizing such person to use a polygraph or voice analysis instrument if such person is in compliance with subdivisions (1)(a), (1)(b), (1)(c), (1)(e), (1)(f), and (2)(b) of section 81-1916 or subdivisions (1)(a), (1)(b), (1)(c), (1)(e), (1)(f), and (2)(c) of section 81-1917 respectively. A person shall apply for an intern's license ten days prior to the commencement of his or her internship.

Laws 1980, LB 485, § 19.